Georgia statutes. TITLE 38 Military, Emergency Management, and Veterans Affairs
Article 2 Veterans Benefits

Cross references.

Discount on park admission fees for certified disabled veterans, §

12-3-9.1

.

Lifetime honorary hunting and fishing licenses for disabled veterans, §

27-2-4

.

Courtesy nonresident fishing licenses to certain paralyzed or disabled veterans, §

27-2-4.2

.

Appointment of guardians for recipients of veterans benefits, T. 29, C. 6.

Disabled veterans and blind persons engaging in peddling, operating businesses, or practicing professions, T. 43, C. 12.

Disabled veterans’ homestead exemption for ad valorem tax purposes, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. VII, Sec. II, Para. I and §

48-5-48

.